apertium-fr-pt.pt.dix
    <pardef n="mil__num">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cento__num">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="C__num">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cinquenta_e_d/ois__num">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uas</l>
          <r>ois<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ois</l>
          <r>ois<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="duzent/os__num">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>os<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>os<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bili/ão__num">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ões</l>
          <r>ão<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ão</l>
          <r>ão<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="a__pr">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="muito__preadv">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tod/o__predet">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>o<s n="predet"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>o<s n="predet"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>o<s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tod/o__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="que__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quem__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nos__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="me__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vos__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="te__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lhe__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="se__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="connosco__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="comigo__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="convosco__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="você__prn">
      
      <!--<e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>-->
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="contigo__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="consigo__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ambas__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ambos__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ambas__det">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ambos__det">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="alguém__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quem_quer__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aquilo__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="algo__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="um_pouco__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="si__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e lm="bilião">
        <i>bili</i>
        <par n="bili/ão__num"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="cento">
        <i>cento</i>
        <par n="cento__num"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="cinquenta e quatro">
        <i>cinquenta<b/>e<b/>quatro</i>
        <par n="C__num"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="mil">
        <i>mil</i>
        <par n="mil__num"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="milhar">
        <i>milhar</i>
        <par n="mil__num"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="milhão">
        <i>milh</i>
        <par n="bili/ão__num"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="oitocentos">
        <i>oitocent</i>
        <par n="duzent/os__num"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="quarenta">
        <i>quarenta</i>
        <par n="C__num"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="quarenta e dois">
        <i>quarenta<b/>e<b/>d</i>
        <par n="cinquenta_e_d/ois__num"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="quinhentos">
        <i>quinhent</i>
        <par n="duzent/os__num"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="vinte e dois">
        <i>vinte<b/>e<b/>d</i>
        <par n="cinquenta_e_d/ois__num"/>
      </e>
        <e lm="como"><i>como</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
      <e lm="muito">
        <i>muito</i>
        <par n="muito__preadv"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="tão">
        <i>tão</i>
        <par n="muito__preadv"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="todo">
        <i>tod</i>
        <par n="tod/o__predet"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="ambas">
        <p><l>ambas</l><r>ambos</r></p>
        <par n="ambas__det"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="ambas as" r="LR">
        <p><l>ambas<b/>as</l><r>ambos<b/>os</r></p>
        <par n="ambas__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="ambos">
        <i>ambos</i>
        <par n="ambos__det"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="ambos os" r="LR">
        <i>ambos<b/>os</i>
        <par n="ambos__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="me" r="LR">
        <i>me</i>
        <par n="me__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="mim">
        <i>mim</i>
        <par n="comigo__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="ninguém">
        <i>ninguém</i>
        <par n="alguém__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="nos" r="LR">
        <i>nos</i>
        <par n="nos__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="nós">
        <i>nós</i>
        <par n="connosco__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="qualquer coisa">
          <i>qualquer<b/>coisa</i>
        <par n="aquilo__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="que">
        <i>que</i>
        <par n="que__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="quem">
        <i>quem</i>
        <par n="quem__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="quem quer">
        <i>quem<b/>quer</i>
        <par n="quem_quer__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="se">
        <i>se</i>
        <par n="se__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="si">
        <i>si</i>
        <par n="si__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="todo">
        <i>tod</i>
        <par n="tod/o__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="tu">
        <i>tu</i>
        <par n="contigo__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="tudo">
        <i>tudo</i>
        <par n="algo__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="você">
        <i>você</i>
        <par n="você__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="vos">
        <i>vos</i>
        <par n="vos__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="vós">
        <i>vós</i>
        <par n="convosco__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="a par de" r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>a<b/>par<b/><a/>de</l>
          <r>a<b/>par<b/>de</r>
        </p>
        <par n="a__pr"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="à moda de" r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>à<b/>moda<b/><a/>de</l>
          <r>à<b/>moda<b/>de</r>
        </p>
        <par n="a__pr"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="lhe" r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>lhe</l>
          <r>lhe</r>
        </p>
        <par n="lhe__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="te" r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>te</l>
          <r>te</r>
        </p>
        <par n="te__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="vos" r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>vos</l>
          <r>vos</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vos__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="me" r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>me</l>
          <r>me</r>
        </p>
        <par n="me__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="nos" r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>nos</l>
          <r>nos</r>
        </p>
        <par n="nos__prn"/>
      </e>
